Utah statutes.
64-9b-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Department" means the Department of Corrections.

(2)  "Inmate" means any man or woman who is under the jurisdiction of the department and who is assigned to the Utah state prison or to a county jail.

